Utah statutes.
31A-30-106.5.   Conversion policy -- Premiums -- Rating restrictions.

(1)  All provisions of Section 31A-30-106.1 apply to conversion policies.

(2)  Conversion policy premium rates may not exceed by more than 35% the index rate for small employers with similar case characteristics for any class of business in which the policy form has been approved.

(3)  An insurer may not consider pregnancy of a covered insured in determining its conversion policy premium rates.

